Maine, session 132, LD1978.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 14 MRSA §8104-A, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Sexual acts toward minors; waiver of statute of limitations. A governmental
entity is liable for intentional and negligent acts or omissions relating to an employee or an
agent of the governmental entity who commits a sexual act towards a minor or engages in
a sexual act with a minor while acting in or under the scope; description; authority whether
actual, implied or apparent; mandate; directive; permission; or other indicia of the
employer-employee relationship, whether on or off the governmental entity's premises.
As used in this subsection, "sexual act towards a minor" has the same meaning as "sexual
acts toward minors" in section 752-C, subsection 2.
This subsection applies to all actions against a governmental entity or an employee or agent
of a governmental entity based upon a sexual act towards a minor regardless of the date of
the sexual act and regardless of whether the statute of limitations on such actions expired
prior to the effective date of this subsection.